src/phonology/sms-phon.twolc
!2016-05-10!"Orthographic Consonant lengthening Weak to strong %{XC%}:Cx for n and l"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in
!2016-05-10! %{XC%}:Cx <=>  Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:Cx _ (j) BetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^C2CC:|%^XY2XYY:] ;
!2016-05-10!        where Cx in (l n) ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!!€ ma%^1VOWnn%^V2VV%^VOWLower%^CC2C
!2016-05-10!!!€ mään0000
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!!€ puärˈr%^VOWLower%^CCC2C
!2016-05-10!!!€ puär0000
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! suâl+N+Sg+Nom __island__
!2016-05-10!!!€ suõlˈl%^VOWLower%^CCC2C
!2016-05-10!!!€ suâl0000
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Orthographic Consonant lengthening in INDPRSSG3 and IMPSG2 0:m"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - kåʹmrded+V+Imp+Sg2: kååʹmmerd 
!2016-05-10! 0:m <=> Vow:Vow (%^1VOW:) (%{%ʹØ%}:)  m _ Vow: Cns: PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^C2CC:  ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!!€ čââʹlmtẹ%^1VOWm%{XC%}%^C2CC%>a
!2016-05-10!!!€ čââʹlmtẹ0mm0%>a
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! kååvas+N+Sg+Nom: __kota__
!2016-05-10!!!€ kå%^1VOWvvaz%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^CC2C%^DeVC
!2016-05-10!!!€ kååv0as00000
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Nom __tear__
!2016-05-10!!!€ kõ%^1VOWnnjâl%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^CC2C
!2016-05-10!!!€ kõõn0jâl0000
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! suâl+N+Nom __island/saari__
!2016-05-10!!!€ suõlˈl%^VOWLower%^CCC2C
!2016-05-10!!!€ suâl0000
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Nom __kilkura__
!2016-05-10!!!€ ǩeâlggal%^Pen%^XYY2XY
!2016-05-10!!!€ ǩeâlǥ0al00
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!!€ dura%^1VOWk%{XC%}%^C2CC%>a
!2016-05-10!!!€ dura0kk0%>a
!2016-05-10!!! kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Ill:
!2016-05-10!!!€ kaađne%^1VOWǩ%{XC%}%^PALNo%^C2CC%>a
!2016-05-10!!!€ kaađne0kk00%>a
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! čårrõs+N+Sg+Gen
!2016-05-10!!!€ čårrõ%^1VOWs%{XC%}%^V2VV%^K2GG
!2016-05-10!!!€ čårrõõzz00
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! lookkmõš+N+Sg+Gen
!2016-05-10!!!€ lookkmõ%^1VOWš%{XC%}%^V2VV%^K2GG
!2016-05-10!!!€ lookkmõ0žž00
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! čâustõk+N+Sg+Gen
!2016-05-10!!!€ čâustõ%^1VOWk%{XC%}%^V2VV%^K2GG
!2016-05-10!!!€ čâustõõǥǥ00
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! čâustõk+N+Sg+Gen
!2016-05-10!!!€ čâustõ%^1VOW0k%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^K2GG
!2016-05-10!!!€ čâustõõʹjj000

!! !!CONSONANT QUALITY CHANGE

!2016-05-10!
!! !Pedagogical X3 length mark after diphthongs in vertical line ˈ 

!2016-05-10!!2015-05-20 What is this?(tbw)


!! !Adding X3 length mark
"Allegro %{1ˈØ%}:ˈ "
 %{1ˈØ%}:ˈ <=>
      Diphth _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:|CodaVar:]+ BetweenStemAndPALNo %^Allegro: ;
!!muõ%{1ˈØ%}%{%ʹØ%}%{rØ%}%{2ˈØ%}r%^Allegro%^CC2C

"Consonant X3 lengthening after diphthong in vertical line ˈ character"
!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in +N+Sg+Ill
!! __jeäll:jiâlˈlu, __
!! b c č ǯ d đ g ǧ k ǩ l m n p r s š t v also htˈt nˈnj
 %{2ˈØ%}:ˈ <=> (%{%ʹØ%}:)     b  _ b    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     c  _ c    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     č  _ č    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     ʒ  _ ʒ    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     ǯ  _ ǯ    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     d  _ d    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     đ  _ đ    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     g: _ g:   [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     ǥ: _ ǥ:   [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     ǧ: _ ǧ:   [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     j _ j:   [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     k: _ k:   [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     ǩ: _ ǩ:   [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)  %{lØ%}:  _ :l (j)   [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
!!€ kuâ%{1ˈØ%}%{%ʹØ%}%{lØ%}%{2ˈØ%}l%^CC2CCC%>a
!!€ kuâ00lˈl0%>a
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     m  _ :m    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     n  _ :n (j)[ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     ŋ  _ ŋ    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     p  _ p    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     %{rØ%}:  _ :r    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     s  _ s    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     š  _ š    [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:) (h) t _ t     [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;
          (%{%ʹØ%}:)     v _ v     [ BetweenStemAndConsGrade %^CC2CCC:| Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: %^CC2CCC:] ;







!! !Removing X3 length mark
!2016-05-10!"Removing Consonant X3 length mark after diphthong in vertical line ˈ LEFT ARROW"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - deriving 
!2016-05-10!!! b c č ǯ d đ g ǧ k ǩ l m n p r s š t v also htˈt nˈnj
!2016-05-10!! BetweenStemAndConsGrade [%^C2CC:|%^XY2XYY:]
!2016-05-10!!! {{{ 
!2016-05-10! ˈ:0 <=> (%{%ʹØ%}:)     b _ b:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     c: _ c:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     č: _ č:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     ʒ _ ʒ:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     ǯ _ ǯ:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     d _ d:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     đ _ đ:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     g: _ g:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     :ǧ _ [:ǧ|ǧ:0|g:0]     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     k: _ k:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade] [%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:|%^Pen: %^KKK2ZERO: ] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     :ǩ _ [:ǩ|ǩ:0|k:0]     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     l _ l:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     m _ m:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     n _ n: (j) [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     p: _ p:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     r _ r:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     s: _ s:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     š: _ š:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:) (h) t: _ t:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!         (%{%ʹØ%}:)     v _ v:     [BetweenStemAndConsGrade | Vow: Cns:*  PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC:|%^CCC2C:] ;
!2016-05-10!!! }}}
!2016-05-10!


         

!"Limitations for ZERO:x 1"
! 0: => [: - 0:| .#.] _ [: - 0:| .#.] ;
